Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1221.
Repealed. 2011, No. 58, § 3.

§ 1222.
Students who may be furnished transportation.

Each legal pupil, as defined in section 1073 of this title, who is entitled or required to attend an elementary school or a secondary school may be furnished with total or partial transportation to school, or board, as in the opinion of the school board is reasonable and necessary to enable the student to attend school. Each school board shall adopt a transportation policy for students required to attend school in accordance with the procedure specified in subdivision 563(1) of this title. The policy shall consider the transportation needs of students, including such factors as the age and health of a student, distance to be travelled, and condition and type of highway. The policy and any subsequent amendments shall be filed in the principal’s office in each school in the district. Compensation may be paid to parents or guardians and shall be payable only in return for actual transportation or board as shall be stipulated by the school board.

The provisions of

23 V.S.A. § 376

relative to the use of motor vehicles for a municipal purpose shall apply to this section.

Expenditures by a school district for transportation or board under this chapter shall be included in computing current school expenses under chapter 123 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 102

, § 1, eff. June 17, 1965;

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1971, No. 12

;

2001, No. 61

, § 75, eff. June 16, 2001;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 128, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1223.
Repealed.
1965, No. 102, § 2, eff. June 17, 1965.

§ 1224.
Reports.

The superintendent shall include in his or her annual report to the school board of each district data regarding the students in the district who have been transported or boarded under the provisions of this chapter and the associated expenses. Annually, at a time fixed by the State Board, the superintendent shall report to the Board regarding the students transported or boarded under the provisions of this chapter and the associated expenses.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 128, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.